Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 3

Charter and Bylaws

48-60-301. Approval by third persons.

The charter may require an amendment to the charter or bylaws to be approved in writing by a specified person or persons other than the board or members. Such a charter provision may only be amended with the approval of such person or persons in the form of a document.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 10.30; 2014, ch. 899, § 64.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-1503, 5-1603.

48-60-302. Amendment terminating members or redeeming or cancelling memberships.

Any amendment to the charter or bylaws which would terminate all members or any class of members or redeem or cancel all memberships of any class of memberships must meet the requirements of chapters 51-68 of this title and this section.

Before adopting a resolution proposing such an amendment, the board of a mutual benefit corporation shall give notice of the general nature of the amendment to the members.

After the board has adopted a resolution proposing such an amendment, the notice to members proposing such amendment shall include one (1) statement of up to five hundred (500) words opposing the proposed amendment if such statement is submitted by any five (5) members or members having three percent (3%) or more of the voting power, whichever is less, not later than twenty (20) days after the board has voted to submit such amendment to the members for their approval. In public benefit corporations, the production and mailing costs shall be paid by the requesting members. In mutual benefit corporations, the production and mailing costs shall be paid by the corporation.

Any such amendment shall be approved by the members by two thirds (2/3) of the voting power.

Section 48-56-302 shall not apply to any amendment meeting the requirements of chapters 51-68 of this title and this section.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 10.31.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-1503, 5-2006, 5-2007.